Washington statutes.
RCW 16.04.040

Jurisdiction—Appeal.

District judges shall have exclusive jurisdiction of all actions and proceedings under RCW 16.04.010 through 16.04.070 when the damages claimed do not exceed one hundred dollars: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any party considering himself or herself aggrieved shall have the right of appeal to the superior court as in other cases.

[ 1987 c 202 s 177; 1893 c 31 s 9; RRS s 3098.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.